District of Columbia statutes.
38-1837.02

Oversight and composition of the Task Force.

(a)

The Public Charter School Board shall oversee the Task Force, which shall be comprised of the following members, or their designees:

(1)

The Mayor;

(2)

The Chairman of the Council;

(3)

The Deputy Mayor for Education;

(4)

The State Superintendent of Education;

(5)

The Chairperson of the Public Charter School Board;

(6)

The Executive Director of the Public Charter School Board; and

(7)

The Chief Financial Officer for the District of Columbia.

(b)

The following shall serve as advisory members of the Task Force;

(1)

The chief financial officers, or their designees, of at least 6 public charter schools, representing a range of enrollment, grade levels, and geographic location;

(2)

Professionals in the field of public charter school financing;

(3)

Representatives from public charter school advocacy groups; and

(4)

Other individuals considered necessary or beneficial by the Public Charter School Board.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4022, 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4022 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4022 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4022 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).